Hawaii statutes.
§200-47.5 Vessel aground on state
property. (a) All vessels grounded on state submerged lands, shorelines,
or coral reefs shall be removed immediately by the owner or operator at the
owner's or operator's expense. Vessels grounded on a sand beach, sandbar, or
mudflat and not in imminent danger of breaking up shall be removed within
seventy-two hours, unless otherwise agreed to by the department. Damage to
state or private property caused by a grounded vessel shall be the sole
responsibility of the vessel's owner or operator.

(b) Solely for the purposes of removal and
with no liability to the department, the department may assume control of any
vessel that:

(1) Is grounded on a coral reef or in imminent danger
of breaking up; and

(2) Cannot be immediately removed by the owner within
twenty-four hours of actual notification to the vessel owner or the owner's
representative by the department and in a manner that is reasonably safe, as
determined by the department. If the department has made good faith efforts to
provide actual notice to the owner or the owner's representative but such
actual notice is futile, the department may assume control of the grounded
vessel within twenty-four hours from the time it has been determined actual
notice is futile. If the owner's representative has received actual notice
from the department and has commenced effective salvage operations, this
section shall not apply.

The owner of the vessel may continue as the
primary agent in salvaging the vessel after twenty-four hours upon providing
proof of a marine insurance policy listing the State as an additional insured
in the amount of at least $1,000,000 and proof that the owner is actively and
effectively initiating a salvage effort with reasonable evidence, as determined
by the department, that the vessel may be saved within seventy-two hours of
grounding; provided that the department may allow an extension beyond the
seventy-two hour limit if it determines that no additional environmental damage
exists. Once the department assumes control over the vessel, the vessel shall
be removed by conventional salvage methods to minimize damage to the natural
resources and not become a hazard to navigation. All costs and expenses of
removing the vessel and damage to state or private property shall be the sole
responsibility of the vessel's owner or operator. This section shall apply
whether the vessel is attended or deemed derelict under section 200-48.

(c) The department may take legal action to
collect any costs or expenses incurred by the department for any removal under
this section. All moneys collected shall be deposited in the boating special
fund.

(d) Any person who renders assistance to the
department when it acts pursuant to subsection (b) and any person who, in good faith
and without remuneration or expectation of remuneration, renders assistance at
the scene of a vessel grounded on a coral reef or in imminent danger of
breaking up shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from the
person's acts or omissions in providing or arranging towage or other
assistance, except for damages caused by the person's gross negligence or
wanton acts or omissions. [L 2006, c 134, §1; am L 2008, c 96, §1; am L 2012, c
57, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next